test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VW_waawaatesi_gt-glossing.yaml
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsmishbaniin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsmishbaniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiinsmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinyminaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinyminaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinyminaanbaniig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinsminaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsminaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsminaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinyminaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinyminaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyminaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinymiwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinymiwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymiwaabniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsminaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsminaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsminaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsmiwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsmiwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmiwaabniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiinymiwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinymiwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiinyminwibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinyminwibniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsmiwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsmiwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsminwibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinyshinaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinyshinaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinyshinaanbaniig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinsshinaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsshinaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsshinaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinyshinaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinyshinaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyshinaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinyshiwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinyshiwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyshiwaabniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsshinaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsshinaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshinaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsshiwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsshiwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshiwaabniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiinyshiwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinyshiwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiinyshinwibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinyshinwibniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsshiwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsshiwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsshinwibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsshinwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiimshinaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiimshinaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiimshinaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiimshinaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiimshinaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshinaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiimshiwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiimshiwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshiwaabniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiimshiwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiimshiwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiimshinwibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiimshinwibniing
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinymishnaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinymishnaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinymishnaanbaniig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinsmishnaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsmishnaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsmishnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinymishnaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinymishnaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymishnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinymishwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinymishwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymishwaabniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsmishnaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsmishnaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmishnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsmishwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsmishwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmishwaabniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiinymishwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinymishwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiinymishniwbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinymishniwbaniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsmishwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsmishwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsmishniwbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsmishniwbaniing
     
